Florida, session 2026, SB700.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSubsection (2) and paragraph (a) of subsection 23 (3) of section 252.36, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 24 252.36âEmergency management powers of the Governor.â 25 (2)âA state of emergency must be declared by executive 26 order or proclamation of the Governor if she or he finds an 27 emergency has occurred or that the occurrence or the threat 28 thereof is imminent. The state of emergency must continue until 29 the Governor finds that the threat or danger has been dealt with 30 to the extent that the emergency conditions no longer exist and 31 she or he terminates the state of emergency by executive order 32 or proclamation, but no state of emergency may continue for 33 longer than 60 days unless renewed by the Governor, subject to 34 the limitations of subsection (3). All executive orders or 35 proclamations issued under this section must indicate the nature 36 of the emergency, the area or areas threatened, and the 37 conditions which brought the emergency about or which make 38 possible its termination. An executive order or proclamation 39 must be promptly disseminated by means calculated to bring its 40 contents to the attention of the general public; and, unless the 41 circumstances attendant upon the emergency prevent or impede 42 such filing, the order or proclamation must be filed promptly 43 with the Department of State, the President of the Senate and 44 the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the offices of 45 the county commissioners in the counties to which the order or 46 proclamation applies. 47 (3)(a)1.âA state of emergency renewed by the Governor 48 expires after 1 year, and any specific order, proclamation, or 49 rule thereunder is terminated, unless the Legislature, by a two 50 thirds vote of the membership of each house, expressly 51 authorizes the extension of the state of emergency. 52 2.âIf the Legislature authorizes a continuance of the state 53 of emergency, the Legislature must set the date the state of 54 emergency terminates. Such date may not be later than the 55 scheduled end of the next regular session. 56 3.âAt any time, the Legislature, by concurrent resolution, 57 may terminate a state of emergency or any specific order, 58 proclamation, or rule thereunder. Upon such concurrent 59 resolution, the Governor shall immediately issue an executive 60 order or proclamation consistent with the concurrent resolution. 61 4.âIf the Legislature terminates or allows a state of 62 emergency to expire, the Governor may not declare a 63 substantially similar state of emergency. 64 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 252.3611, Florida 65 Statutes, is amended to read: 66 252.3611âTransparency; audits.â 67 (3)âOnce an emergency exceeds 1 year, the Auditor General 68 shall conduct a financial audit of all associated expenditures 69 and a compliance audit of all associated contracts entered into 70 during the declared emergency. The Auditor General shall must 71 update the audit quarterly annually until the emergency is 72 declared to be ended. 73 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.